Maine, session 132, LD1615.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §18302, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Adjunct dentist. "Adjunct dentist" means an individual who holds a valid
adjunct dentist license issued by the board.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §18302, sub-§3-B is enacted to read:
3-B. Adjunct dentist license. "Adjunct dentist license" means the authority granted
to an individual who is a graduate of a dental school or college, who is not licensed to
practice dentistry in this State and who is authorized to practice under the general
supervision of a dentist in a board-approved setting in accordance with this chapter.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §18342, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 163, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Dentist license. Except as provided in section 18347, an applicant for licensure as
a dentist must comply with the provisions of section 18341 and must provide:
A. Verification of either a doctoral degree in dentistry from a dental program
accredited by the American Dental Association Commission on Dental Accreditation
or its successor organization or the educational equivalent of a doctoral degree in
dentistry, as determined by the board. If the applicant holds an adjunct dentist license
in good standing and provides verification that the applicant has actively practiced
during the 3 consecutive years immediately preceding application to the board, that
applicant is deemed to be in compliance with this paragraph; and
B. Verification of passing all examinations required by the board.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §18342, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Adjunct dentist license. An applicant for an adjunct dentist license must comply
with section 18341 and must provide:
A. Verification of a degree in dentistry from a dental school or college;
B. Verification of passing all examinations required by the board;
C. Verification that the applicant will be practicing dentistry in a board-approved
setting within the State; and
D. A statement from the supervising dentist under section 18371, subsection 5 that
demonstrates that the general supervision and control of the services to be performed
by the applicant are adequate and that the performance of these services are within the
applicant's dental knowledge and skill.
Sec. 5. 32 MRSA §18371, sub-§2, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. An individual with an adjunct dentist license may provide dental services only in
the board-approved setting for which the license was issued by the board and if
authorized by a written practice agreement under the general supervision of a dentist
licensed in this State pursuant to subsection 7.
Sec. 6. 32 MRSA §18371, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2019, c. 388, §9, is further
amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2107(01)

5. Supervision of dental therapists and adjunct dentists. A dentist, referred to in
this section as the "the supervising dentist," who employs a dental therapist or adjunct
dentist shall comply with this subsection.
A. A supervising dentist shall arrange for another dentist or specialist to provide any
services needed by a patient of a dental therapist or adjunct dentist supervised by that
dentist that are beyond the scope of practice of the dental therapist or adjunct dentist
and that the supervising dentist is unable to provide.
B. The supervising dentist is responsible for all authorized services and procedures
performed by the dental therapist pursuant to a written practice agreement executed by
the dentist pursuant to section 18377.
B-1. The supervising dentist is responsible for all authorized services and procedures
performed by the adjunct dentist pursuant to a written practice agreement executed by
the dentist pursuant to subsection 7.
C. Revisions to a written practice agreement must be documented in a new written
practice agreement signed by the supervising dentist and the dental therapist or adjunct
dentist.
D. A supervising dentist who signs a written practice agreement shall file a copy of
the agreement with the board, keep a copy for the dentist's own records and make a
copy available to patients of the dental therapist or adjunct dentist upon request.
Sec. 7. 32 MRSA §18371, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Adjunct dentist practice requirements. An adjunct dentist must comply with the
following practice limitations.
A. An adjunct dentist may practice under the general supervision of a dentist pursuant
to a written practice agreement signed by both parties. A written practice agreement is
a signed document that outlines the functions that the adjunct dentist is authorized to
perform. An adjunct dentist may practice only under the standing order of the
supervising dentist, may provide only care that follows written protocols and may
provide only services that the adjunct dentist is authorized to provide by the written
practice agreement.
B. A written practice agreement between a supervising dentist and an adjunct dentist
must include the following elements:
(1) The services and procedures and the practice settings for those services and
procedures that the adjunct dentist may provide, together with any limitations on
those services and procedures;
(2) Any age-specific and procedure-specific practice protocols, including case
selection criteria, assessment guidelines and imaging frequency;
(3) Procedures to be used with patients treated by the adjunct dentist for obtaining
informed consent and for creating and maintaining dental records;
(4) A plan for managing medical emergencies in each practice setting in which the
adjunct dentist provides care;
(5) A quality assurance plan for monitoring care, including patient care review,
referral follow-up and a quality assurance chart review;
Page 2 - 132LR2107(01)

(6) Protocols for administering and dispensing medications, including the specific
circumstances under which medications may be administered and dispensed;
(7) Criteria for providing care to patients with specific medical conditions or
complex medical histories; and
(8) Specific written protocols, including a plan for providing clinical resources
and referrals, governing situations in which the patient requires treatment that
exceeds the scope of practice or capabilities of the adjunct dentist.
C. Revisions to a written practice agreement must be documented in a new written
practice agreement signed by the supervising dentist and the adjunct dentist.
D. An adjunct dentist shall file a copy of a written practice agreement with the board,
keep a copy for the adjunct dentist’s own records and make a copy available to patients
of the adjunct dentist upon request.
E. An adjunct dentist shall refer patients in accordance with a written practice
agreement to another qualified dental or health care professional to receive needed
services that exceed the scope of practice of the adjunct dentist.
F. An adjunct dentist who provides services or procedures beyond those authorized in
a written practice agreement engages in unprofessional conduct and is subject to
discipline pursuant to section 18325.